test/src/morphology/verbOddTV_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Odd-syllable -it transitive verbs. Lexicon UNNEDIT_TV, BÁHTARIT_IV, JÅLLÅRIT_IV, LASSÁNIT_IV

Tests:
  Verb - sliggudit: # UNNEDIT_TV
    sliggudit+V+TV+Inf: sliggudit 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Sup: sliggudittjat
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ger: sliggudattijn
    sliggudit+V+TV+PrfPrc: sliggudam
    sliggudit+V+TV+Actio+Ess: sliggudime
    sliggudit+V+TV+Actio+Ela: sliggudimes
    sliggudit+V+TV+VAbess: sliggudik
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sliggudav
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: sligguda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: sliggut
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du1: sliggudin 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du2: sliggudihppe
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Du3: sliggudibá
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: sliggudi
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: sliggudiv
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: sliggudi
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: sliggudij
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du1: sliggudijma 
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Du2: sliggudijda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: sliggudin
    sliggudit+V+TV+Imprt+Sg2: sligguda
    sliggudit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl1: sliggudip
    sliggudit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl2: [sliggudit,sliggudihtit]
    sliggudit+V+TV+Imprt+Pl3: sliggudisá
    sliggudit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl2: sligguduhtut
    sliggudit+V+TV+ImprtII+Pl3: sliggudusá
    sliggudit+V+TV+Pot+Pl1: sliggudittjap
    sliggudit+V+TV+Pot+Pl2: sliggudittjabihtit
    sliggudit+V+TV+Pot+Pl3: sliggudittji
    sliggudit+V+TV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: sligguduváv

  Verb - æjvvárit: # BÁHTARIT_IV
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Inf: æjvvárit 
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Sup: æjvvárittjat
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ger: æjvvárattijn
    æjvvárit+V+IV+PrfPrc: æjvváram
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: æjvvárime
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: æjvvárimes
    æjvvárit+V+IV+VAbess: æjvvárik
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: æjvvárav
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: æjvvára
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: æjvvár
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: æjvvárin 
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: æjvvárihppe
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: æjvváribá
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: æjvvári
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: æjvváriv
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: æjvvári
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: æjvvárij
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: æjvvárijma 
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: æjvvárijda
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: æjvvárin
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: æjvvára
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: æjvvárip
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [æjvvárit,æjvvárihtit]
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: æjvvárisá
    æjvvárit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: æjvváruhtut
    æjvvárit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: æjvvárusá
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: æjvvárittjap
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: æjvvárittjabihtit
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: æjvvárittji
    æjvvárit+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: æjvváruvvá

  Verb - budáldit: # JÅLLÅRIT_IV
    budáldit+V+IV+Inf: budáldit 
    budáldit+V+IV+Sup: budáldittjat
    budáldit+V+IV+Ger: budáldattijn
    budáldit+V+IV+PrfPrc: budáldam
    budáldit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: budáldime
    budáldit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: budáldimes
    budáldit+V+IV+VAbess: budáldik
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: budáldav
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: budálda
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: budált
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: budáldin 
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: budáldihppe
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: budáldibá
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: budáldi
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: budáldiv
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: budáldi
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: budáldij
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: budáldijma 
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: budáldijda
    budáldit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: budáldin
    budáldit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: budálda
    budáldit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: budáldip
    budáldit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [budáldit,budáldihtit]
    budáldit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: budáldisá
    budáldit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: budálduhtut
    budáldit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: budáldusá
    budáldit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: budáldittjap
    budáldit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: budáldittjabihtit
    budáldit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: budáldittji
    budáldit+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: budálduvvá

  Verb - buorránit : # LASSÁNIT_IV
    buorránit+V+IV+Inf: buorránit 
    buorránit+V+IV+Sup: buorránittjat
    buorránit+V+IV+Ger: buorránattijn
    buorránit+V+IV+PrfPrc: buorránam
    buorránit+V+IV+Actio+Ess: buorránime
    buorránit+V+IV+Actio+Ela: buorránimes
    buorránit+V+IV+VAbess: buorránik
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg1: buorránav
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg2: buorrána
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Sg3: buorrán
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du1: buorránin 
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du2: buorránihppe
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Du3: buorránibá
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prs+Pl3: buorráni
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg1: buorrániv
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg2: buorráni
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Sg3: buorránij
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du1: buorránijma 
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Du2: buorránijda
    buorránit+V+IV+Ind+Prt+Pl3: buorránin
    buorránit+V+IV+Imprt+Sg2: buorrána
    buorránit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl1: buorránip
    buorránit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl2: [buorránit,buorránihtit]
    buorránit+V+IV+Imprt+Pl3: buorránisá
    buorránit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl2: buorránuhtut
    buorránit+V+IV+ImprtII+Pl3: buorránusá
    buorránit+V+IV+Pot+Pl1: buorránittjap
    buorránit+V+IV+Pot+Pl2: buorránittjabihtit
    buorránit+V+IV+Pot+Pl3: buorránittji
    buorránit+V+IV+Der/Pass+V+Inf: []
